Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 5. Assault and Battery
§ 6-2-507.
Abuse, neglect, abandonment, intimidation or exploitation of a vulnerable adult; penalties.

Except under circumstances constituting a violation of W.S.

6-2-502

, a person is guilty of abuse, neglect, abandonment or exploitation of a vulnerable adult if the person intentionally or recklessly abuses, neglects, abandons, intimidates or exploits a vulnerable adult.

Reckless abuse, neglect, abandonment, intimidation or exploitation of a vulnerable adult is a misdemeanor, punishable by not more than one (1) year in jail, a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both, and registration of the offender’s name on the central registry.

Intentional abuse, neglect or abandonment of a vulnerable adult is a felony punishable by not more than ten (10) years in prison, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both, and registration of the offender’s name on the central registry.

Exploitation of a vulnerable adult is a felony punishable by not more than ten (10) years in prison, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both, and registration of the offender’s name on the central registry.

As used in this section:

“Abandonment” means as defined in W.S. 35-20-102(a)(i);

“Abuse” means as defined in W.S. 35-20-102(a)(ii);

Repealed by Laws 2020, ch. 87, § 3.

“Central registry” means the registry established under W.S.

35-20-115

;

“Exploitation” means as defined in W.S. 35-20-102(a)(ix);

“Neglect” means as defined in W.S. 35-20-102(a)(xi);

“Vulnerable adult” means as defined in W.S. 35-20-102(a)(xviii).

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 86, § 1; 2007, ch. 209, § 1; 2020 ch. 87, § 3, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) substituted “person” for “caregiver” twice and inserted “intimidates”; inserted “intimidation or exploitation” in (b); and made related and stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, repealed (e)(iii), which read “‘Caregiver’ means as defined in W.S. 35-20-102(a)(iv).”

Vulnerable adult. —

Restitution. —

Nolo Contendere. —

Vulnerable adult.—

Vulnerable adult. —

Evidence was sufficient to convict defendant of third degree sexual assault and intentional abuse of a vulnerable adult because his continued contact after the victim said “no” and his grabbing her hand and placing it on his genitals constituted physical force reasonably calculated to cause submission; he knew or reasonably should have known that the victim through a mental deficiency or developmental disability was incapable of appraising the nature of her conduct as several witnesses testified that the victim’s physical characteristics and speech made her disability apparent; and, despite his intoxication, defendant was capable of forming the intent to abuse a vulnerable adult as he appeared coherent and oriented to time and place.
Brown v. State, 2019 WY 102, 450 P.3d 208,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 104

(Wyo. 2019).

Restitution. —

In a case in which defendant pled guilty to intentionally exploiting a vulnerable adult, and was ordered to pay restitution, the evidence provided a reasonable basis for calculating the amount of restitution because, given the victim’s impairment, a person had to view defendant’s suggestion that the victim’s generosity was independent of her exploitation with suspicion; defendant made a post-arrest admission to her adult children that she took advantage of her knowledge that the victim would give her anything she asked for, and that she should have stopped before he ran out of money; and the victim did not have the computer equipment or skills to set up online payments to charitable organizations. Voelker v. State, 2018 WY 72, 420 P.3d 1098,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2018).

Nolo Contendere. —

District court
adequately described the nature of the abuse of a vulnerable adult
charge, and because it accurately and completely recited the elements
of the charge, no factual basis was necessary; because defendant pleaded
nolo contendere to the abuse of a vulnerable adult charge, the district
court was only required to ensure that the Information contained an
accurate and complete statement of all the elements of the crime charged. Williams v. State, 2015 WY 100, 354 P.3d 954,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2015), reh'g denied,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. Aug. 26, 2015).

Vulnerable adult.—

There was sufficient evidence to establish that the victim was a vulnerable adult, including his daughter's testimony that the victim suffered form memory loss, alcoholism, and other mental problems, and defendant's acknowledgement that she knew about the victim's problems with alcohol, PTSD, and memory from personal observation and access to his medical records. Blevins v. State, 2017 WY 43, 393 P.3d 1249,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2017).

§ 6-2-508.
Assault and battery on corrections or detention officer; penalties; definitions.

A person is guilty of assault and battery on a corrections or detention officer if he recklessly:

Propels any dangerous substance at the corrections officer, detention officer or staff member while the corrections officer, detention officer or staff member is acting in the course of his official duty, or as a result of the corrections officer’s, detention officer’s or staff member’s official duties; or

Tampers with or alters any item by contaminating the item with any dangerous substance, if the item may be handled or consumed by the corrections officer, detention officer or staff member while the corrections officer, detention officer or staff member is acting in the course of his official duty, or as a result of the corrections officer’s, detention officer’s or staff member’s official duties.

A person is guilty of aggravated assault and battery on a corrections or detention officer if he intentionally or knowingly:

Propels any dangerous substance at the corrections officer, detention officer or staff member while the corrections officer, detention officer or staff member is acting in the course of his official duty, or as a result of the corrections officer’s, detention officer’s or staff member’s official duties; or

Tampers with or alters any item by contaminating the item with any dangerous substance, if the item may be handled or consumed by the corrections officer, detention officer or staff member while the corrections officer, detention officer or staff member is acting in the course of his official duty, or as a result of the corrections officer’s, detention officer’s or staff member’s official duties.

A violation of subsection (a) of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

A violation of subsection (b) of this section is a felony punishable by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or both.

A violation of subsection (b) of this section, by a person who knows he has a contagious life threatening disease and who commits the violation with the intent to infect a corrections officer, detention officer or staff member with the contagious life threatening disease, shall result in the enhancement of the sentence entered under subsection (d) of this section by a period of imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years.

As used in this section:

“Dangerous substance” includes, but is not limited to, blood, urine, saliva, vomitus, semen and feces;

“Corrections officer” means a person who is employed by the department of corrections and works at a department of corrections facility to care for, supervise and control persons in the custody of the department of corrections;

“Detention officer” means a person who is employed by a county or municipality to care for, supervise and control persons detained in a jail or holding facility and includes a peace officer in the detention setting;

“Staff member” means:

A department of corrections staff member, or a person employed pursuant to a contract with the department of corrections, who works with, or in the vicinity of, inmates; and

A volunteer authorized by the department of corrections or other entity in charge of a corrections facility to work with, or in the vicinity of, inmates.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 177, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 177, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 6-2-509.
Strangulation of a household member; penalty.

A person is guilty of strangulation of a household member if he intentionally and knowingly or recklessly causes or attempts to cause bodily injury to a household member by impeding the normal breathing or circulation of blood by:

Applying pressure on the throat or neck of the household member; or

Blocking the nose and mouth of the household member.

Strangulation of a household member is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years.

For purposes of this section, “household member” means as defined in W.S. 35-21-102(a)(iv)(A) through (D), (G) and (H).

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 136, § 1; 2018 ch. 88, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (b), substituted “than ten (10) years” for “than five (5) years.”

Effective date. —

Laws 2011, ch. 136, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

Evidence sufficient. —

Double jeopardy.—

Guilty Plea. —

Lesser included offense instructions. —

Evidence sufficient. —

Battery lesser included offense of strangulation of a household
member. —

Evidence sufficient. —

There was sufficient evidence to support the jury’s guilty verdict for strangulation of a household member because in addition to the testimony of a Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner, an emergency room physician who saw the victim testified as an expert about strangulation and opined that the victim was strangulated; in addition to the doctor’s testimony, the State introduced dozens of photos documenting the victim’s injuries Morones v. State, 2020 WY 85,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(June 24, 2020).

Evidence established that defendant’s wife experienced an impediment to the normal circulation of her blood causing bodily injury, and defendant’s strangulation conviction was affirmed; doctors testified that the wife had symptoms consistent with strangulation, including the petechiae and subconjunctival hemorrhages in both eyes, and while either symptom alone might not establish strangulation, the wife said defendant had choked her, and when she returned for more treatment two days later, she had severe bruising and pain in her neck. Gonzalez-Chavarria v. State, 2019 WY 100, 449 P.3d 1094,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 2019).

Double jeopardy.—

It was not plain error to convict defendant of both strangulation of a household member and the lesser-included offense of domestic battery because the convictions did not violate a clear and unequivocal rule of law, as the convictions did not violate double jeopardy since the crimes arose from separate and distinct acts, as the underlying acts occurred in different rooms and were separated by some amount of time and resulted in separate injuries to the victim. Drakeford v. State, 2017 WY 115, 402 P.3d 980,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 2017).

Guilty Plea. —

District court abused its discretion in denying defendant's motion to withdraw his guilty plea because there a reasonable probability that defendant would have rejected the plea had counsel advised him of his almost assured deportation; as a result of defendant's felony conviction for strangling a household member, defendant became an “aggravated felon” under the Immigration and Nationality Act, and thus, also became a Level 1 offender, which was the highest priority for deportation. Ortega-Araiza v. State, 2014 WY 99, 331 P.3d 1189,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2014).

District court did not violate a clear and unequivocal rule of law when it accepted defendant’s guilty plea to stalking and strangulation of a household member because there was a sufficient factual basis for the plea where defendant testified he placed his hand on the victim’s neck or throat to stop her from yelling and screaming and believed his action impeded her breathing or blood flow. Beeson v. State, 2022 WY 86, 512 P.3d 986,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 2022).

Lesser included offense instructions. —

Defendant,
charged with strangulation of a household member, under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-509

, was not entitled to a lesser included offense instruction
on domestic battery, under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-511

, because the domestic battery statute did not exist when
defendant committed the crime. Nickels v. State, 2015 WY 85, 351 P.3d 288,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2015).

Defendant,
charged with strangulation of a household member, under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-509

, was not entitled to a lesser included offense instruction
on battery, under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-501(b), because nothing showed defendant attacked the victim
other than by applying pressure to the victim's neck or throat or
that the pressure applied caused pain without impeding the victim's
breathing, so a jury could not rationally find defendant battered
the victim without strangling the victim. Nickels v. State, 2015 WY 85, 351 P.3d 288,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2015).

When defendant
was charged with strangulation of a household member, an alleged factual
dispute about whether defendant and the victim were household members,
under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 35-21-102(a)(iv)(B), (D) and (H), did not entitle defendant to a lesser included
offense instruction because there was no evidentiary support for the
notion that they were not household members, since, at least, they
were involved in a dating relationship. Nickels v. State, 2015 WY 85, 351 P.3d 288,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2015).

Evidence sufficient. —

Evidence that the victim had extensive petechiae around her neck and ears, complained of a headache to the emergency room nurse, and was diagnosed with asphyxiation, or oxygen deprivation by a doctor, was sufficient to establish that the victim experienced bodily injury as defined by Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-1-104

, and as required to prove strangulation. Davis v. State, 2017 WY 147, 406 P.3d 1233,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 2017).

Battery lesser included offense of strangulation of a household
member. —

Battery is
a lesser included offense of strangulation of a household member because
(1) the crimes share the same mental element and require bodily injury
by some type of physical force, and (2) strangulation also requires
proof that the victim was a household member and the defendant caused
bodily injury by impeding the victim's normal breathing with the specific
physical force of pressure to the throat or neck, so the elements
of the lesser crime (battery) are a subset of the greater crime (strangulation). Nickels v. State, 2015 WY 85, 351 P.3d 288,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2015).

Quoted in

Cecil v. State, 2015 WY 158,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Dec. 29, 2015).

§ 6-2-510.
Domestic assault.

A household member is guilty of domestic assault if, having the present ability to do so, he unlawfully attempts to cause bodily injury to another household member.

Domestic assault is punishable as follows:

By imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both;

By imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both, if the person has previously been convicted of domestic assault or if the person has previously been convicted of the following or similar offense against another household member:

Domestic battery under W.S.

6-2-511

;

Simple assault under W.S. 6-2-501(a);

Battery under W.S. 6-2-501(b);

Aggravated assault and battery under W.S.

6-2-502

;

Child abuse under W.S.

6-2-503

;

Reckless endangering under W.S.

6-2-504

;

Unlawful contact under W.S. 6-2-501(g);

Strangulation of a household member under W.S.

6-2-509

;

Kidnapping under W.S.

6-2-201

;

Felonious restraint under W.S.

6-2-202

; or

False imprisonment under W.S.

6-2-203

.

If a person sentenced under paragraph (b)(i) or (ii) of this section is placed on probation, the court may, notwithstanding any other provision of law, impose a term of probation exceeding the maximum one (1) year imprisonment, provided the term of probation, including extensions, shall not exceed three (3) years.

As used in this section:

“Convicted” means a person has been convicted upon a plea of guilty or no contest or has been found guilty;

“Household member” means as defined in W.S.

35-21-102

;

“Similar offense” means a substantially similar law of this or any other state, tribe or territory.

History.

2014 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2017 ch. 172, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 88, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “term of probation” for “term or probation” near the end.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (b)(i), inserted “imprisonment for not more than six (6) months” and added “or both” at the end; in (b)(ii), substituted “than one (1) year” for “than six (6) months”; added (b)(ii)(G) through (M); in (c), substituted “paragraph (b)(i) or (ii) of this” for “paragraph (b)(ii) of this,” “maximum one (1) year imprisonment” for “maximum six (6) months imprisonment,” and “exceed three (3) years” for “exceed one (1) year”; and made a stylistic change.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2014, ch. 13, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 6-2-511.
Domestic battery.

A household member is guilty of domestic battery if he knowingly or recklessly causes bodily injury to another household member by use of physical force.

Domestic battery is punishable as follows:

By imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both;

By imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both, if within the previous five (5) years, the person has been convicted of domestic battery or any of the following or similar offenses against another household member:

Domestic assault under W.S.

6-2-510

;

Simple assault under W.S. 6-2-501(a);

Battery under W.S. 6-2-501(b);

Aggravated assault and battery under W.S.

6-2-502

;

Child abuse under W.S.

6-2-503

;

Reckless endangering under W.S.

6-2-504

;

Unlawful contact under W.S. 6-2-501(g);

Strangulation of a household member under W.S.

6-2-509

;

Kidnapping under W.S.

6-2-201

;

Felonious restraint under W.S.

6-2-202

; or

False imprisonment under W.S.

6-2-203

.

By imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both, if within the previous ten (10) years, the person has been convicted of domestic battery two (2) or more times or has been convicted of domestic battery and any of the following or similar offense against another household member:

Domestic assault under W.S.

6-2-510

;

Simple assault under W.S. 6-2-501(a);

Battery under W.S. 6-2-501(b);

Aggravated assault and battery under W.S.

6-2-502

;

Child abuse under W.S.

6-2-503

;

Reckless endangering under W.S.

6-2-504

;

Unlawful contact under W.S. 6-2-501(g);

Strangulation of a household member under W.S.

6-2-509

;

Kidnapping under W.S.

6-2-201

;

Felonious restraint under W.S.

6-2-202

; or

False imprisonment under W.S.

6-2-203

.

If a person sentenced under paragraph (b) (i) or (ii) of this section is placed on probation, the court may, notwithstanding any other provision of law, impose a term of probation exceeding the maximum imprisonment of one (1) year, provided the term of probation, including extensions, shall not exceed three (3) years.

As used in this section:

“Convicted” means a person has been convicted upon a plea of guilty or no contest or has been found guilty;

“Household member” means as defined in W.S.

35-21-102

;

“Similar offense” means a substantially similar law of this or any other state, tribe or territory.

History.

2014 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2017 ch. 172, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 88, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “term of probation” for “term or probation” near the end.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added (b)(ii)(G) through (M); in (b)(iii), substituted “ten (10) years” for “five (5) years” and “ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00)” for “two thousand dollars ($2,000.00)”; added (b)(iii)(G) through (M); in (c), substituted “paragraph (b)(i) or (ii) of this section” for “paragraph (b)(ii) of this section” and “exceed three (3) years” for “exceed two (2) years”; and made stylistic changes.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2014, ch. 13, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

Victim impact evidence relevant.—

Double jeopardy.—

Lesser included offense instructions. —

Victim impact evidence relevant.—

In connection with defendant’s conviction of strangulation of a household member and domestic battery, because victim impact evidence was relevant, defendant failed to establish plain error; the challenged testimony regarding a description of the shelter and apartment where the victim stayed was not likely to arouse the jury’s passions, plus the defense raised the prospect that the availability of free services from the agency provided a motive for the victim to make a false report, which was directly related to the victim’s credibility. Dumas v. State, 2018 WY 120, 428 P.3d 449,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 2018).

Double jeopardy.—

It was not plain error to convict defendant of both strangulation of a household member and the lesser-included offense of domestic battery because the convictions did not violate a clear and unequivocal rule of law, as the convictions did not violate double jeopardy since the crimes arose from separate and distinct acts, as the underlying acts occurred in different rooms and were separated by some amount of time and resulted in separate injuries to the victim. Drakeford v. State, 2017 WY 115, 402 P.3d 980,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 2017).

Lesser included offense instructions. —

Defendant, charged with strangulation of a household member, under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-509

, was not entitled to a lesser included offense instruction on domestic battery, under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-511

, because the domestic battery statute did not exist when defendant committed the crime. Nickels v. State, 2015 WY 85, 351 P.3d 288,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2015).